adj.lexc
!!!adj.lexc!!!

Multichar_Symbols +Adj +N +Neg +Posv +Comp +Supr +Nom +Poss +1p +2p +3p

LEXICON Root
AdjPrefix;
Adj;

LEXICON AdjPrefix
+Neg:naa^ Adj;
+Neg:by^ Adj;‌
+Posv:baa^ Adj;
+Posv:por^ Adj; 


LEXICON AdjInf
+Adj:0 #;


!Adjectival Enclitics

+Adj+Poss+1P+Sg:^m#;
+Adj+Poss+2P+Sg:^t #;
+Adj+Poss+3P+Sg:^sh #;
+Adj+Poss+1P+Pl:^maan #;
+Adj+Poss+2P+Pl:^taan #;
+Adj+Poss+3P+Pl:^shaan #;

+Adj+Comp+Poss+1P+Sg:^trm #;
+Adj+Comp+Poss+2P+Sg:^trt #;
+Adj+Comp+Poss+3P+Sg:^trsh #;
+Adj+Comp+Poss+2P+Pl:^trtaan #;
+Adj+Comp+Poss+3P+Pl:^trshaan #;

+Adj+Supr+Poss+1P+Sg:^trynm #;
+Adj+Supr+Poss+2P+Sg:^trynt #;
+Adj+Supr+Poss+3P+Sg:^trynsh #;
+Adj+Supr+Poss+2P+Pl:^tryntaan #;
+Adj+Supr+Poss+3P+Pl:^trynshaan #;

!Comparative and Superlative
+Adj+Comp:^tr #;
+Adj+Supr:^tryn #;

!Derivational morphology
+Adj+Nom:^y #;






LEXICON Adj

xsth	AdjInf;
bd		AdjInf;
xwb		AdjInf;
bykaar	AdjInf;
dwwm	AdjInf;
awwl	AdjInf;
swwm	AdjInf;
srd		AdjInf;
zybaa	AdjInf;
xwshaaynd AdjInf;
mymwn	AdjInf;
raast	AdjInf;
